Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.271

Background check clearance registry—Background application form.

The department shall maintain an individual-based or portable background check clearance registry. Any individual seeking a child care license or employment in any child care facility or outdoor nature-based child care program licensed or regulated under current law shall submit a background application on a form prescribed by the department in rule.

[ 2023 c 437 s 3; 2021 c 304 s 12; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 207; 2011 c 295 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.215.216.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.